Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-152
Certified public accountant or public accountant; partnership
or limited liability company; use of titles
or term C.P.A.; requirements.

No partnership
or limited liability company shall assume or use the title or designation
certified public accountant or
public accountant or the abbreviation C.P.A. or any other title,
designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to
indicate that such partnership or limited liability company is composed of
certified public accountants unless such partnership or limited liability
company is registered as a partnership of certified public accountants or
a limited liability company of certified public accountants under section
1-126 and holds a permit issued under subdivision (1)(b) of
section 1-136 which is not revoked or suspended and all of such partnership's
or limited liability company's offices in this state for the practice of public
accountancy are maintained and registered as required under section 1-135.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 47, p. 72;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 51;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 42;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 26.